.history/data/liheci_mini_20251209131926.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
    +Lemma +VTypeA +Head +Tail +WHOLE

LEXICON Root

! lemma: 谈恋爱（整词）
谈恋爱+Lemma+VTypeA+WHOLE : 谈恋爱 #;

! 从 Root 也能走到 Head / Tail 词库
0:0 Liheci_Head;
0:0 Liheci_Tail;

LEXICON Liheci_Head
谈+Head : 谈 #;

LEXICON Liheci_Tail
恋爱+Tail : 恋爱 #;
0:0 #;

END
